Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.205

Claims arising from emergency management related activities—Filing—Contents.

All claims against the state for property damages or indemnification therefor arising from emergency management related activities will be presented to and filed with the director of financial management. Contents of all such claims shall conform to the tort claim filing requirements found in RCW 4.92.100 as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1984 c 38 s 21; 1979 c 151 s 43; 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 24; 1971 ex.s. c 8 s 4.]